Vermont, session 2025-2026, H104.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Electricity and Natural Gas Efficiency Entity * * *
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 209(d) is amended to read:
(d) Energy efficiency.
* * *
(4) Contract or order of appointment. Appointment of an entity under
subdivision (2) of this subsection may be by contract or by an order of
appointment. An appointment, whether by order of appointment or by
contract, may only be issued after notice and opportunity for hearing. An order
of appointment shall be for a limited duration not to exceed 12 years, although
an entity may be reappointed by order or contract. An order of appointment
may include any conditions and requirements that the Commission deems
appropriate to promote the public good. An order of appointment shall require
that any program operated, or benefit issued by the entity, exclude a veteran’s
disability benefit from the calculation of the individual’s taxable income as
defined by 32 V.S.A. § 5811(21) or the individual’s adjusted gross income as
defined by 26 U.S.C. § 62, respectively, for the purpose determining eligibility.
For good cause, after notice and opportunity for hearing, the Commission may
amend or revoke an order of appointment.
* * *
VT LEG #379259 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.104
2025 Page 3 of 4
* * * Department for Children and Families * * *
Sec. 2. 33 V.S.A. § 125 is added to read:
§ 125. VETERANS’ DISABILITY BENEFITS; EXCLUDED INCOME
Any State program or benefit administered or operated by the Department
shall exclude a veteran’s disability benefit from the calculation of the
individual’s taxable income as defined by 32 V.S.A. § 5811(21) or the
individual’s adjusted gross income as defined by 26 U.S.C. § 62, respectively,
for the purpose determining eligibility.
* * * Department of Vermont Health Access * * *
Sec. 3. 33 V.S.A. § 405 is added to read:
§ 405. VETERANS’ DISABILITY BENEFITS; EXCLUDED INCOME
Any State program or benefit administered or operated by the Department
shall exclude a veteran’s disability benefit from the calculation of the
individual’s taxable income as defined by 32 V.S.A. § 5811(21) or the
individual’s adjusted gross income as defined by 26 U.S.C. § 62, respectively,
for the purpose determining eligibility.
* * * Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living * * *
Sec. 4. 33 V.S.A. § 506 is added to read:
§ 506. VETERANS’ DISABILITY BENEFITS; EXCLUDED INCOME
Any State program or benefit administered or operated by the Department
shall exclude a veteran’s disability benefit from the calculation of the
VT LEG #379259 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.104
2025 Page 4 of 4
individual’s taxable income as defined by 32 V.S.A. § 5811(21) or the
individual’s adjusted gross income as defined by 26 U.S.C. § 62, respectively,
for the purpose determining eligibility.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379259 v.1